Utah statutes.
53A-8a-408.   Mentor for provisional educator.

(1)  In accordance with Subsections 53A-1a-104(7) and 53A-6-102(2)(a) and (b), the principal or immediate supervisor of a provisional educator shall assign a person who has received training or will receive training in mentoring educators as a mentor to the provisional educator.

(2)  Where possible, the mentor shall be a career educator who performs substantially the same duties as the provisional educator and has at least three years of educational experience.

(3)  The mentor shall assist the provisional educator to become effective and competent in the teaching profession and school system, but may not serve as an evaluator of the provisional educator.

(4)  An educator who is assigned as a mentor may receive compensation for those services in addition to the educator's regular salary.

